District of Columbia statutes.
29-701.05

Powers.

A limited partnership shall have the powers to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities or affairs, including the power to sue, be sued, and defend in its own name and to maintain an action against a partner for harm caused to the limited partnership by a breach of the partnership agreement or violation of a duty to the partnership.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(2)(C), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-701.07.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities or affairs” for “activities.”

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 105 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.